Colorado statutes. TITLE 40 Utilities
ARTICLE 7.5
CIVIL REMEDIES AVAILABLE TO UTILITIES

Section

40-7.5-101. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Bypassing" means the act of attaching, connecting, or in any manner affixing any wire, cord, socket, motor, pipe, or other instrument, device, or contrivance to the utility supply system or any part thereof in such a manner as to transmit, supply, or use any utility service without passing through an authorized meter or other device provided for measuring, registering, determining, or limiting the amount of electricity, gas, or water consumed.

"Customer" means the person responsible for payment for utility services for the premises, and such term includes employees and agents of the customer.

"Person" means any individual, firm, partnership, corporation, company, association, joint-stock association, or other legal entity.

"Tampering" means the act of damaging, altering, adjusting, or in any manner interfering with or obstructing the action or operation of any meter or other device provided for measuring, registering, determining, or limiting the amount of electricity, gas, or water consumed.

"Unauthorized metering" means the act of removing, moving, installing, connecting, reconnecting, or disconnecting any meter or metering device for utility service by a person other than an authorized contractor, employee, or agent of such utility.

"Utility" means any pipeline corporation, gas corporation, electrical corporation, water corporation, irrigation system, cooperative association, nonprofit corporation, nonprofit association, municipality, or person operating in whole or in part for the purpose of supplying electricity, gas, steam, or water, or any combination thereof, to the public or to any person.

"Utility service" means the provision of electricity, gas, steam, water, or any other service or commodity furnished by the utility for compensation.

"Utility supply system" includes all wires, conduits, pipes, cords, sockets, motors, meters, instruments, and other devices whatsoever used by the utility for the purpose of providing utility services.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1564, § 1, effective July 1.

40-7.5-102. Civil action allowed.

A utility may bring a civil action for damages against any person who commits, authorizes, solicits, aids, abets, or attempts any of the following acts resulting in damages to the utility: Bypassing, tampering, or unauthorized metering. In addition, a utility may bring a civil action for damages pursuant to this section against any person who knowingly receives utility service through means of bypassing, tampering, or unauthorized metering. An action brought pursuant to this section shall be commenced within three years after the cause of action accrues.

In any civil action brought pursuant to this section, the utility shall be entitled, upon proof of willful or intentional bypassing, tampering, or unauthorized metering, to recover as damages three times the amount of the actual damages, if any, plus all reasonable expenses and costs incurred on account of the bypassing, tampering, or unauthorized metering, including, but not limited to, costs and expenses for investigation, disconnection, reconnection, service calls, employees and equipment, and expert witnesses; costs of the suit; and reasonable attorney fees.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1565, § 1, effective July 1.

40-7.5-103. Presumptions.

There is a rebuttable presumption that a tenant or occupant of any premises where bypassing, tampering, or unauthorized metering is proven to exist caused or had knowledge of such bypassing, tampering, or unauthorized metering if the tenant or occupant had controlled access to the part of the utility supply system on the premises where the bypassing, tampering, or unauthorized metering is proven to exist and if said tenant or occupant was responsible or partially responsible for payment, either directly or indirectly, to the utility or to any other person for utility services provided for the premises.

There is a rebuttable presumption that a utility customer at any premises where bypassing, tampering, or unauthorized metering is proven to exist caused or had knowledge of such bypassing, tampering, or unauthorized metering if the customer had controlled access to the part of the utility supply system on the premises where the bypassing, tampering, or unauthorized metering is proven to exist.

The presumptions provided in this section shall only shift the burden of going forward with evidence and shall in no event shift the burden of proof to the defendant in any action brought pursuant to this article.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1565, § 1, effective July 1.

40-7.5-104. Remedies cumulative.

It is the purpose of this article to provide additional remedies to avoid the wrongful use of the facilities of utilities, and nothing in this article shall abridge or alter rights of action or remedies existing prior to July 1, 1983, or created on or after said date.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1566, § 1, effective July 1.